src/morphology/roots/pronouns.lexc
[WORD_ID=semmoinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:semmoisen     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=semmoinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN][STYLE=DIALECT]:semmosen    A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=semmoinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:semmoiseen    A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=semmoinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL][STYLE=DIALECT]:semmoseen   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=semmoinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:semmoisessa   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=semmoinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=INE][STYLE=DIALECT]:semmosessa  A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=semmoinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=INS]:semmoisen     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=semmoinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=INS][STYLE=DIALECT]:semmosen    A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=semmoinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:semmoinen     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=semmoinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM][STYLE=DIALECT]:semmonen    A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=semmoinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:semmoista     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=semmoinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR][STYLE=DIALECT]:semmosta    A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=semmoinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:semmoiseksi   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=semmoinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA][STYLE=DIALECT]:semmoseksi  A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=se][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=DEMONSTRATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:sittä      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=se][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=DEMONSTRATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:sieltä     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=se][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=DEMONSTRATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:siltä      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=se][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=DEMONSTRATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL][STYLE=DIALECT]:sielt    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=se][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=DEMONSTRATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:siellä     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=se][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=DEMONSTRATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:sillä      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=se][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=DEMONSTRATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE][STYLE=DIALECT]:siel     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=se][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=DEMONSTRATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:sille      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=se][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=DEMONSTRATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=CMT]:sine   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=se][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=DEMONSTRATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:siitä      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=se][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=DEMONSTRATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA][STYLE=DIALECT]:siit     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=se][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=DEMONSTRATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:sinä   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=se][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=DEMONSTRATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:sen    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=se][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=DEMONSTRATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:siihen     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=se][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=DEMONSTRATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:siinä      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=se][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=DEMONSTRATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=INE][STYLE=DIALECT]:siin     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=se][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=DEMONSTRATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=INE][STYLE=DIALECT]:siin     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=se][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=DEMONSTRATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=INS]:sen    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=se][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=DEMONSTRATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:se     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=se][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=DEMONSTRATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:sitä   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=se][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=DEMONSTRATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:siksi      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=siellä][POS=PROADVERB][SUBCAT=DEMONSTRATIVE]:siellä   ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sieltä][POS=PROADVERB][SUBCAT=DEMONSTRATIVE]:sieltä   ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sie][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL][STYLE=DIALECT]:siulta    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sie][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ACC][STYLE=DIALECT]:siut  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sie][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE][STYLE=DIALECT]:siulla    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sie][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL][STYLE=DIALECT]:siulle    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sie][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA][STYLE=DIALECT]:siusta    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sie][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS][STYLE=DIALECT]:siuna     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sie][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN][STYLE=DIALECT]:siun  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sie][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL][STYLE=DIALECT]:sinnuun   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sie][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL][STYLE=DIALECT]:siuhun    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sie][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=INE][STYLE=DIALECT]:siussa    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sie][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM][STYLE=DIALECT]:sie    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sie][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR][STYLE=DIALECT]:sinnuu    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sie][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR][STYLE=DIALECT]:sinuu     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sie][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR][STYLE=DIALECT]:siua  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sie][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR][STYLE=DIALECT]:siuta     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sie][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA][STYLE=DIALECT]:siuksi    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=siihen][POS=PROADVERB][SUBCAT=DEMONSTRATIVE]:siihen   ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=siinä][POS=PROADVERB][SUBCAT=DEMONSTRATIVE]:siinä   ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=siitä][POS=PROADVERB][SUBCAT=DEMONSTRATIVE]:siitä   ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=siksi][POS=PROADVERB][SUBCAT=DEMONSTRATIVE]:siksi   ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=silloin][POS=PROADVERB][SUBCAT=DEMONSTRATIVE]:silloin  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sinne][POS=PROADVERB][SUBCAT=DEMONSTRATIVE]:sinne   ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sinä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:sinutta    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sinä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:sinulta    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sinä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ACC]:sinut  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sinä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:sinulla    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sinä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:sinulle    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sinä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=CMT]:sinune     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sinä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:sinusta    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sinä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:sinuna     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sinä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:sinun  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sinä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:sinuun     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sinä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:sinussa    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sinä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=INS]:sinun  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sinä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:sinä    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sinä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:sinua  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sinä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:sinuksi    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=siten][POS=PROADVERB][SUBCAT=DEMONSTRATIVE]:siten   ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sitä][POS=PROADVERB][SUBCAT=DEMONSTRATIVE]:sitä   ADV_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL][STYLE=DIALECT]:sulta  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ACC][STYLE=DIALECT]:sut    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE][STYLE=DIALECT]:sulla  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL][STYLE=DIALECT]:sulle  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA][STYLE=DIALECT]:susta  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS][STYLE=DIALECT]:suna   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN][STYLE=DIALECT]:sun    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL][STYLE=DIALECT]:suhun  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=INE][STYLE=DIALECT]:sussa  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM][STYLE=DIALECT]:sä      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR][STYLE=DIALECT]:sua    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA][STYLE=DIALECT]:suksi  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=sää][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM][STYLE=DIALECT]:sää    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=teitti][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL][STYLE=DIALECT]:teittiltä    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=teitti][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE][STYLE=DIALECT]:teittillä    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=teitti][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL][STYLE=DIALECT]:teittille    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=teitti][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA][STYLE=DIALECT]:teittissä    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=teitti][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS][STYLE=DIALECT]:teittinä    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=teitti][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN][STYLE=DIALECT]:teittin    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=teitti][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL][STYLE=DIALECT]:teittiin    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=teitti][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=INE][STYLE=DIALECT]:teittissä    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=teitti][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM][STYLE=DIALECT]:teitti    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=teitti][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR][STYLE=DIALECT]:teittiä    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=te][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:teittä    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=te][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL][STYLE=NONSTANDARD]:teilt     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=te][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:teiltä    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=te][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ACC]:teidät    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=te][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE][STYLE=NONSTANDARD]:teill     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=te][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:teillä    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=te][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL][STYLE=NONSTANDARD]:teill     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=te][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:teille    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=te][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=CMT]:teine     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=te][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA][STYLE=NONSTANDARD]:teist     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=te][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:teistä    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=te][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:teinä     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=te][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:teidän    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=te][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:teihin    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=te][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=INE][STYLE=NONSTANDARD]:teis      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=te][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:teissä    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=te][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:tein      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=te][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:te    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=te][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:teitä     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=te][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA][STYLE=NONSTANDARD]:teiks     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=te][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:teiksi    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
